District of Columbia statutes.
10-140

Rock Creek Park — Establishment.

The tract of land lying on both sides of Rock Creek, beginning at Klingle Ford Bridge, and running northwardly, following the course of said creek, acquired under the Act of September 27, 1890, Chapter 1001, shall be perpetually dedicated and set apart as a public park or pleasure ground for the benefit and enjoyment of the people of the United States, to be known by the name of Rock Creek Park.

Sept. 27, 1890, 26 Stat. 492, ch. 1001, § 1
This section is referenced in § 10-142.
1981 Ed., § 8-140.
1973 Ed., § 8-146.